src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON goabbácase
         +Sg+Nom:%>         K-VOW ;
         +Sg+Gen:%>Q1         K-VOW ;
         +Sg+Acc:%>Q1v        K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Ill:%>j        K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Ine:%>Q1n        K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Ela:%>Q1s        K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Com:%>Q1jn       K-CONS ;
         	+Ess:%>n        K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Nom:%>Q1         K-VOW ;
         +Pl+Gen:%>Q1j        K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Acc:%>Q1jt       K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Ill:%>Q1jda      K-VOW ;
         +Pl+Ine:%>Q1jn       K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Ela:%>Q1js       K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Com:%>Q1j        K-CONS ;
         
!    +Sg+Ine+Attr:ppán%>        K-CONS ; ! Spiik: "i attributiv ställning böjes det i allmänhet som demonstrative 
    +Sg+Ill+Attr:%>Q1         K-VOW ; !         pronomen, men med inessiv före inessiv..."
    +Sg+Ela+Attr:%>Q1t        K-VOW ;
         
 !       +Sg+Abe:ppá%>#da      K-VOW ;
  +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:%>Q1#dak     K-CONS ; ! 
  +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:%>#dagi    K-VOW ; ! 
  +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:%>#dagá    K-VOW ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Err/Orth:%>Q1#tagá    K-VOW ; ! 
!        +Pl+Abe:ppá%>j#da     K-VOW ;
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:%>Q1j#dak    K-CONS ; ! 
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:%>Q1j#dagi   K-VOW ; ! 
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:%>Q1j#dagá   K-VOW ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:ppá%>j#tagá   K-VOW ; ! 

! possessive suffixes:
    +Sg+Ine+Attr:%>Q1         K-VOW ;
    +Sg+Ill+Attr:%>Q1        K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Nom+PxDu1:%>ma       K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Nom+PxDu2:%>da       K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Nom+PxDu3:%>ska      K-VOW ;
!   +Use/NG+Sg+Gen:ppá%>        NAMÁK ; !  adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
   +Sg+Gen+PxDu1:%>Q1ma       K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Gen+PxDu2:%>Q1da       K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Gen+PxDu3:%>Q1ska      K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Acc+PxDu1:%>Q1ma       K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Acc+PxDu2:%>Q1da       K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Acc+PxDu3:%>Q1ska      K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Ill+PxDu1:%>simme    K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Ill+PxDu2:%>sihtte   K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Ill+PxDu3:%>siska    K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Ine+PxDu1:%>Q1nimme    K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Ine+PxDu2:%>Q1nihtte   K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Ine+PxDu3:%>Q1niska    K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Ela+PxDu1:%>Q1stimme   K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Ela+PxDu2:%>Q1stihtte  K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Ela+PxDu3:%>Q1stiska   K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Com+PxDu1:%>Q1jnimme   K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Com+PxDu2:%>Q1jnihtte  K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Com+PxDu3:%>Q1jniska   K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Nom+PxDu1:%>Q1ma       K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Nom+PxDu2:%>Q1da       K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Nom+PxDu3:%>Q1ska      K-VOW ;
!  +Use/NG+Pl+Gen:ppá%>j        NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
   +Pl+Gen+PxDu1:%>Q1jimme    K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Gen+PxDu2:%>Q1jihtte   K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Gen+PxDu3:%>Q1jiska    K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Acc+PxDu1:%>Q1jdimme   K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Acc+PxDu2:%>Q1jdihtte  K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Acc+PxDu3:%>Q1jdiska   K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Ill+PxDu1:%>Q1jdisema  K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Ill+PxDu2:%>Q1jdiseda  K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Ill+PxDu3:%>Q1jdiseska K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Ine+PxDu1:%>Q1jnimme   K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Ine+PxDu2:%>Q1jnihtte  K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Ine+PxDu3:%>Q1jniska   K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Ela+PxDu1:%>Q1jstimme  K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Ela+PxDu2:%>Q1jstihtte K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Ela+PxDu3:%>Q1jstiska  K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Com+PxDu1:%>Q1jimme    K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Com+PxDu2:%>Q1jihtte   K-VOW ;
   +Pl+Com+PxDu3:%>Q1jiska    K-VOW ;

LEXICON foc-k
        +Nom:%>	 	   K-posneg ;
        +Gen:%>Q1      K-posneg ;
        +Acc:%>Q1      K-posneg ;
        +Ill:si%> 	   K-posneg ;
        +Ine:%>Q1ni    K-posneg ;
        +Ela:%>Q1sti   K-posneg ;
        +Com:%>Q1jni   K-posneg ;
        +Ess:ni%>	   K-posneg ;
        +Ill+Attr:%>   K-posneg ;
        +Ela+Attr:%>   K-posneg ;
        +Ine+Attr:%>   K-posneg ;


LEXICON foc-k-åvtå
        +Gen:%>Q1    K-posneg ;
        +Acc:%>Q1    K-posneg ;
        +Ine:%>Q1ni  K-posneg ;
        +Ela:%>Q1sti K-posneg ;
        +Com:%>Q1jni K-posneg ;

LEXICON K-s-VOW ! Alternative clitic lexicon
 +Clt:s # ;
 K-VOW ;


! Indefinite pronouns
! -------------------

LEXICON moaddacase           
 +Sg+Gen:oatte%>       K-VOW ;
 +Sg+Acc:oatte%>v      K-CONS ; 
 +Sg+Acc:oadda%>      K-VOW ; 
 +Sg+Ill:oaddá%>j      K-CONS ; 
 +Sg+Ine:oatte%>n      K-CONS ; 
 +Sg+Ela:oatte%>s      K-CONS ; 
 +Sg+Com:åtti%>jn     K-CONS ;    
 +Sg+Par:oatte%>t      K-CONS ; 
 
 +Sg+Gen:oatte%>       NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;                
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:oatte%>  K-VOW ;
 +Sg+Ine+Attr:oatte%>n K-CONS ;     
 +Sg+Ela+Attr:oatte%>t K-CONS ; 

+Pl+Gen:åtti%>j K-CONS ;
+Pl+Acc:åtti%>jt K-CONS ;
+Pl+Ill:åtti%>jda K-VOW ;
+Pl+Ela:åtti%>js K-CONS ;
+Pl+Ine:åtti%>jn K-CONS ;
+Pl+Com:åtti%>j K-CONS ;

LEXICON máŋŋgacase           
 +Sg+Gen:%>       K-VOW ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:%>  K-VOW ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>       NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;                
 +Sg+Acc:%>v      K-CONS ; 
 +Sg+Ine:%>n      K-CONS ; 
 +Sg+Ine+Attr:%>n K-CONS ;     
 +Sg+Ela:%>s      K-CONS ; 
 +Sg+Ela+Attr:%>t K-CONS ; 
 +Sg+Com:%>jn     K-CONS ;    
 +Sg+Par:%>t      K-CONS ;     

LEXICON ållocase  
 +Sg+Nom:%>     K-VOW ;         
 +Sg+Gen:%>Q1   K-VOW ;
! +Sg+Ill+Attr:%> K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>Q1v  K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>X4j  K-CONS ;     
 +Sg+Ela:%>Q1s  K-CONS ;      
 +Sg+Ine:%>Q1n  K-CONS ;   
 +Sg+Com:%>Q1jn K-CONS ;         
 +Sg+Par:%>Q1t  K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>Q1   K-VOW ; 
 +Pl+Gen:%>Q1j  K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>Q1jt K-CONS ;      
 +Pl+Ela:%>Q1js K-CONS ;      
 +Pl+Ine:%>Q1jn K-CONS ;   
 +Pl+Com:%>Q1j  K-CONS ;    


LEXICON guhtikobl
          +Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-k:ŋga   # ;
          +Sg+Gen+Foc/Pos-k:ŋga   # ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-k:nga   # ; !typos genga insted of geŋga
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+Foc/Pos-k:nga   # ;!typos genga insted of geŋga
 +Use/NG+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-k:ŋgak   # ;
 +Use/NG+Sg+Gen+Foc/Pos-k:ŋgak   # ;
 +Use/NG+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-k:ŋge   # ; ! dial
 +Use/NG+Sg+Gen+Foc/Pos-k:ŋge   # ; ! dial
! +Use/NG+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-k:ŋga   NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
! +Use/NG+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-k:ŋge   NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
        +Sg+Acc+Foc/Neg-k:vga   # ;
        +Sg+Acc+Foc/Pos-k:vga   # ;
 +Use/NG+Sg+Acc+Foc/Neg-k:vgak  # ; !
 +Use/NG+Sg+Acc+Foc/Pos-k:vgak  # ; ! 
        +Sg+Ill+Foc/Neg-k:sik   # ;
        +Sg+Ill+Foc/Pos-k:sik   # ;
 +Use/NG+Sg+Ill+Foc/Neg-k:sisik # ;   ! 
 +Use/NG+Sg+Ill+Foc/Pos-k:sisik # ;   !
        +Sg+Com+Foc/Neg-k:jnak  # ;
        +Sg+Com+Foc/Pos-k:jnak  # ;
 +Use/NG+Sg+Com+Foc/Neg-k:jnanik  # ;
 +Use/NG+Sg+Com+Foc/Pos-k:jnanik  # ;
        +Pl+Gen+Foc/Neg-k:jga   # ;
        +Pl+Gen+Foc/Pos-k:jga   # ;
 +Use/NG+Pl+Gen+Foc/Neg-k:jgak   # ;
 +Use/NG+Pl+Gen+Foc/Pos-k:jgak   # ;
! +Use/NG+Pl+Ge+Foc/Neg-kn:jga   NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
 +Use/NG+Pl+Acc+Foc/Neg-k:jdik  # ; !?
 +Use/NG+Pl+Acc+Foc/Pos-k:jdik  # ; !?
        +Pl+Acc+Foc/Neg-k:jdak  # ; ! 
        +Pl+Acc+Foc/Pos-k:jdak  # ; !
        +Pl+Ill+Foc/Neg-k:jdak  # ;
        +Pl+Ill+Foc/Pos-k:jdak  # ;
        +Pl+Ine+Foc/Neg-k:jnak  # ;
        +Pl+Ine+Foc/Pos-k:jnak  # ;
 +Use/NG+Pl+Ine+Foc/Neg-k:jnajnik  # ;
 +Use/NG+Pl+Ine+Foc/Pos-k:jnajnik  # ;
        +Pl+Ela+Foc/Neg-k:jstak # ;
        +Pl+Ela+Foc/Pos-k:jstak # ;
 +Use/NG+Pl+Ela+Foc/Neg-k:jstajstik # ;
 +Use/NG+Pl+Ela+Foc/Pos-k:jstajstik # ;
        +Pl+Com+Foc/Neg-k:jga   # ;
        +Pl+Com+Foc/Pos-k:jga   # ;
 +Use/NG+Pl+Com+Foc/Neg-k:jgak   # ;
 +Use/NG+Pl+Com+Foc/Pos-k:jgak   # ;

LEXICON migeobl
          +Sg+Gen:ŋga     # ;
   +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:ŋgak    # ;
   +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:ŋge     # ;  ! dial
!   +Use/NG+Sg+Gen:ŋga     NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
!   +Use/NG+Sg+Gen:ŋge     NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
          +Sg+Acc:vga     # ;
   +Use/NG+Sg+Acc:vgak    # ; ! 
          +Sg+Ill:sik        # ; 
   +Sg+Ill+Use/NG:sisik      # ;
          +Sg+Ine:nºnak      # ; 
   +Sg+Ine+Use/NG:nºnanik    # ; 
          +Sg+Ela:sstak      # ; 
   +Sg+Ela+Use/NG:sstastik   # ; 
          +Sg+Com:jnak    # ;
   +Sg+Com+Use/NG:jnanik  # ;
   +Use/NG+Sg+Com:jnek    # ; ! dial
             +Ess:nenik   # ;
      +Use/NG+Ess:nºnak   # ; ! 
          +Pl+Nom:hkka    # ; ! 
 +Err/Orth+Pl+Nom:kka    # ; ! 
   +Use/NG+Pl+Nom:hkkak   # ; ! 
          +Pl+Gen:jga    # ;
   +Use/NG+Pl+Gen:jgak    # ;
          +Pl+Acc:jdik    # ; ! 
   +Use/NG+Pl+Acc:jdek    # ; ! dial
   +Use/NG+Pl+Acc:jdak    # ; !dial
          +Pl+Ine:jnak    # ;
   +Use/NG+Pl+Ine:jnajnik # ; ! 
          +Pl+Ela:jstak   # ;
   +Use/NG+Pl+Ela:jstajstik   # ;
          +Pl+Com:jga     # ;
   +Use/NG+Pl+Com:jgak # ;

LEXICON ietjácase
             +Sg+Gen:a      K-VOW ;
 !            +Sg+Gen:      NAMÁK ; !adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
             +Sg+Acc:av     K-CONS ;
             +Sg+Ill:ij     K-CONS ; 
             +Sg+Ela:is     K-CONS ; 
             +Sg+Ine:in     K-CONS ;
             +Sg+Com:ijn    K-CONS ;
                +Ess:in     K-CONS ;
             +Pl+Nom:a      K-VOW ;
             +Pl+Gen:ij     K-CONS ;
             +Pl+Acc:ijt    K-CONS ;
             +Pl+Ill:ijda   K-s-VOW ;
             +Pl+Ine:ijn    K-CONS ;
             +Pl+Ela:ijs    K-CONS ;
             +Pl+Com:ij     K-CONS ;
             
  !+Sg+Abe+Use/-Spell:#da     K-VOW ;
      +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:#dak     K-CONS ; ! 
      +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:#dagi    K-VOW ; ! 
      +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:#dagá    K-VOW ; ! 
     +Err/Orth+Sg+Abe:#tagá   K-VOW ; ! 
 !+Pl+Abe+Use/-Spell:ij#da    K-VOW ;
      +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#dak   K-CONS ; ! 
      +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#dagi  K-VOW ; ! 
      +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#dagá  K-VOW ; ! 
     +Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:ij#tagá K-VOW ; ! 

LEXICON oblsoamescase
                       ednagacase ;
        +Sg+Gen:a      K-VOW ;
        +Sg+Acc:av     K-CONS ;
        +Sg+Ill:ij     K-CONS ; 
        +Sg+Ela:is     K-CONS ; 
        +Sg+Ine:in     K-CONS ;
        +Sg+Com:ijn    K-CONS ;
!       +Sg+Abe:a#da   K-VOW ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:a#dak  K-CONS ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:a#dagi K-VOW ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:a#dagá K-VOW ; ! 
+Sg+Abe+Err/Orth:a#tagá K-VOW ; ! 

LEXICON ednagacase
         +Pl+Nom:a       K-VOW ;
         +Pl+Gen:ij      K-CONS ;
!         +Pl+Gen:ij      NAMÁK ; !adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
         +Pl+Acc:ijt     K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Ill:ijda    K-VOW ;
         +Pl+Ine:ijn     K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Ela:ijs     K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Com:ij      K-CONS ;
 !       +Pl+Abe:ij#da   K-VOW ;
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#dak  K-CONS ; ! 
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#dagi K-VOW ; ! 
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#dagá K-VOW ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:ij#tagá K-VOW ; ! 

!LEXICON aktakoblcase
!        +Nom:%>	 	 K-posneg ;
!        +Gen:%>Q1    K-posneg ;
!        +Acc:%>Q1    K-posneg ;
!        +Ill:si%> 	 K-posneg ;
!        +Ine:%>Q1ni  K-posneg ;
!        +Ela:%>Q1sti K-posneg ;
!        +Com:%>Q1jni K-posneg ;
!        +Ess:ni%>	 K-posneg ;

        ! +Use/NG+Gen:     NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
 
LEXICON muhtemcase
           +Attr:        K-CONS ;
 !   +Use/NG+Attr:        NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
         +Sg+Nom:        K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Gen:a       K-VOW ;
         +Sg+Acc:av      K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Ill:ij      K-CONS ; 
         +Sg+Ela:is      K-CONS ; 
         +Sg+Ine:in      K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Com:ijn     K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Nom:a       K-VOW ;
         +Pl+Gen:ij      K-CONS ;
!         +Pl+Gen:ij      NAMÁK ; !adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
         +Pl+Acc:ijt     K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Ill:ijda    K-VOW ;
         +Pl+Ine:ijn     K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Ela:ijs     K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Com:ij      K-CONS ;
            +Ess:in      K-CONS ;
 !       +Sg+Abe:a#da    K-VOW ;
  +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:a#dak   K-CONS ; ! 
  +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:a#dagi  K-VOW ; ! 
  +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:a#dagá  K-VOW ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Err/Orth:a#tagá  K-VOW ; ! 
         +Pl+Abe:ij#da   K-VOW ;
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#dak  K-CONS ; ! 
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#dagi K-VOW ; ! 
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#dagá K-VOW ; ! 
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#tagá K-VOW ; !  
